Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.180

Public notice by electronic means.

(1) Notwithstanding any provisions of this title, wherever notice by publication is required by a trust institution, such notice may be undertaken by internet publication upon terms and conditions that the director may prescribe by rule.

(2) Notice to shareholders required under this title may be undertaken by electronic means in the same manner as permitted for general business corporations under RCW 23B.01.410.

[ 2014 c 37 s 320.]